Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-2457
Prescription Drug Safety Act; act, how cited.

Sections 71-2457 to 71-2483 shall be known and may be cited as the Prescription Drug Safety Act.

Laws 2015, LB37, § 1;

Laws 2020, LB1052, § 12.